Utah statutes.
34-29-9.   Commission to be returned if employment not secured.

It shall be unlawful for an employment agent to retain, directly or indirectly, any money or other valuable consideration received for any information or assistance described in Section 34-29-1, if the person for whom such information or assistance is furnished fails through no neglect or fault of his own to secure the employment regarding which such information or assistance is furnished; and the money or consideration shall be by the agent forthwith returned to the payer of the same upon demand.

